Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1636
Complaint; when considered; notice; hearing.

The board may consider a complaint after ten days' written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to such school or to such agent, or both, as appropriate, giving notice of a time and place for hearing thereon. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 36;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2836;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 36.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.